Wisconsin, session 2025, AB620.
do enact as follows:AB620,11Section 1. 115.28 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,2,122115.28 (7) (b) Subject to the same rules and laws concerning qualifications of 3applicants and granting and revocation of licenses or certificates under par. (a), the 4state superintendent shall grant certificates and licenses to teachers in private 5schools and tribal schools, except that teaching experience requirements for such 6certificates and licenses may be fulfilled by teaching experience in public, private, 7or tribal schools. An applicant is not eligible for a license or certificate unless the 8state superintendent finds that the private school or tribal school in which the 9applicant taught offered an adequate educational program during the period of the 10applicant’s teaching therein. Private Except as provided under ss. 115.7915 (2) (i), 11118.60 (2) (a) 6m., and 119.23 (2) (a) 6m., private schools are not obligated to employ 12only licensed or certified teachers.AB620,213Section 2. 115.7915 (2) (i) of the statutes is created to read:AB620,3,414115.7915 (2) (i) 1. Except as provided in subd. 3., beginning on July 1, 2027, 1all of the eligible school’s teachers have a teaching license or permit issued by the 2department, except that a teacher employed by the eligible school who teaches only 3courses in rabbinical studies is not required to hold a license or permit to teach 4issued by the department.AB620,3,652. Except as provided in subd. 3., beginning on July 1, 2027, all of the eligible 6school’s administrators have an administrator’s license issued by the department.AB620,3,1673. Any teacher or administrator employed by the eligible school on July 1, 82027, who has been teaching or employed as an administrator for at least the 5 9consecutive years immediately preceding July 1, 2027, and who does not satisfy the 10requirements under subd. 1. or 2. on July 1, 2027, applies to the department on a 11form prepared by the department for a temporary, nonrenewable waiver from the 12requirements under subd. 1. or 2. The department shall promulgate rules to 13implement this subdivision, including the form of the application and the process by 14which the waiver application will be reviewed. The application form shall require 15the applicant to submit a plan for satisfying the requirements under subd. 1. No 16waiver granted under this subdivision is valid after July 1, 2032.AB620,317Section 3. 118.19 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,3,2318118.19 (1) Except as provided in subs. (1b) and (1c) and s. 118.40 (8) (b) 1. and 192., any person seeking to teach in a public school, including a charter school, or in a 20school or institution operated by a county or the state, in a private school 21participating in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or in a private 22school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 shall first procure a license 23or permit from the department.AB620,41Section 4. 118.19 (1b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,4,72118.19 (1b) An individual may teach an online course in a subject and level in 3a public school, including a charter school, in a private school participating in a 4parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or in a private school 5participating in the program under s. 115.7915 without a license or permit from the 6department if the individual holds a valid license or permit to teach the subject and 7level in the state from which the online course is provided.AB620,58Section 5. 118.19 (1c) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,4,159118.19 (1c) (b) (intro.) A faculty member of an institution of higher education 10may teach in a public high school, including a charter school that operates only high 11school grades, in a private school participating in a parental choice program under 12s. 118.60 or 119.23 that operates only high school grades, or in a private school 13participating in the program under s. 115.7915 that operates only high school 14grades without a license or permit from the department if the faculty member 15satisfies all of the following:AB620,616Section 6. 118.19 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,5,1717118.19 (3) (a) No license to teach in any public school may be issued unless the 18applicant possesses a bachelor’s degree including such professional training as the 19department by rule requires, except as permitted under par. (b) and ss. 115.28 (17) 20(a), 118.191, 118.1915, 118.192, 118.193, 118.194, and 118.197. Notwithstanding s. 2136.11 (16), no teacher preparatory program in this state may be approved by the 22state superintendent under s. 115.28 (7) (a), unless each student in the program is 23required to complete student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester 1following the daily schedule and semester calendar of the cooperating school or the 2equivalent, as determined by the state superintendent. No license to teach in any 3public school may be granted to an applicant who completed a professional training 4program outside this state unless the applicant completed student teaching 5consisting of full days for a full semester following the daily schedule and semester 6calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state 7superintendent. The state superintendent may grant exceptions to the student 8teaching requirements under this paragraph when the midyear calendars of the 9institution offering the teacher preparatory program and the cooperating school 10differ from each other and would prevent students from attending classes at the 11institution in accordance with the institution’s calendar. The state superintendent 12shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. If for the purpose of granting 13a license to teach or for approving a teacher preparatory program the state 14superintendent requires that an institution of higher education be accredited, the 15state superintendent shall accept accreditation by a regional or national 16institutional accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. department of education or 17by a programmatic accrediting organization.AB620,718Section 7. 118.19 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,6,519118.19 (3) (b) The state superintendent shall permanently certify any 20applicant to teach Wisconsin native American languages and culture who has 21successfully completed the university of Wisconsin-Milwaukee school of education 22approved Wisconsin native American languages and culture project certification 23program at any time between January 1, 1974, and December 31, 1977. School 1districts shall A school district, the governing body of a private school participating 2in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or the governing body of a 3private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 may not assign 4individuals certified under this paragraph to teach courses other than Wisconsin 5native American languages and culture, unless they qualify under par. (a).AB620,86Section 8. 118.19 (10) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,6,107118.19 (10) (b) 1. Conduct a background investigation of each applicant for 8issuance or renewal of a license or permit, including a license or permit issued to a 9pupil services professional, and for a faculty member seeking to teach in a public 10high school without a license or permit.AB620,911Section 9. 118.191 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,6,2112118.191 (2) (a) Notwithstanding s. 118.19 (7) to (9), the department shall 13grant an initial teaching license to teach a technical education subject to an 14individual who is eligible for licensure under s. 118.19 (4) and (10), who scores at 15least 100 points on the point system under sub. (5), of which at least 25 points are 16from sub. (5) (a) 1. and at least 25 points are from sub. (5) (a) 2., and who agrees to 17complete during the term of the license a curriculum determined by the school 18board of the school district, by the governing body of the private school participating 19in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of 20the private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 in which the 21individual will teach.AB620,1022Section 10. 118.191 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,7,923118.191 (2) (b) Notwithstanding s. 118.19 (7) to (9), the department shall 1grant an initial teaching license to teach a vocational education subject to an 2individual who is eligible for licensure under s. 118.19 (4) and (10), who scores at 3least 100 points on the point system under sub. (5m), of which at least 25 points are 4from sub. (5m) (a) 1. and at least 25 points are from sub. (5m) (a) 2., and who agrees 5to complete during the term of the license a curriculum determined by the school 6board of the school district, by the governing body of the private school participating 7in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of 8the private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 in which the 9individual will teach.AB620,1110Section 11. 118.191 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,7,1411118.191 (2m) An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) authorizes an 12individual to teach only in the school district controlled by the school board, or in 13the private school controlled by the governing body, that determined the curriculum 14the individual agreed to complete in order to qualify for the initial teaching license.AB620,1215Section 12. 118.191 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,7,1916118.191 (3) An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) is valid for 3 17years. An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) is void if the license holder 18ceases to be employed as a teacher in the school district or private school in which 19the license holder is authorized to teach under sub. (2m).AB620,1320Section 13. 118.191 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,8,821118.191 (4) Upon the expiration of the 3-year term of an initial teaching 22license issued under sub. (2), the department shall issue to the license holder a 23professional teaching license to teach the technical education subject or vocational 1education subject if the individual successfully completed the curriculum that the 2individual agreed to under sub. (2), as determined by the school board of the school 3district, by the governing body of the private school participating in a parental 4choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of the private 5school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 that established the 6curriculum. The department shall indicate on a professional teaching license 7issued under this subsection that the license was obtained under the experience-8based licensure program under this section.AB620,149Section 14. 118.192 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,8,1310118.192 (4) A school board or private school participating in a parental choice 11program under s. 118.60 or 119.23 that employs a person who holds a professional 12teaching permit shall ensure that no regularly licensed teacher is removed from his 13or her position as a result of the employment of persons holding permits.AB620,1514Section 15. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,8,1915118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and d., all of the private 16school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s 17degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, 18including a masters master’s or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited 19institution of higher education. This subd. 6. a. does not apply after June 30, 2027.AB620,1620Section 16. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,9,221118.60 (2) (a) 6. b. All of the private school’s administrators have at least a 22bachelor’s degree from a nationally or regionally accredited institution of higher 1education or a teaching license or administrator’s license issued by the department. 2This subd. 6. b. does not apply after June 30, 2027.AB620,173Section 17. 118.60 (2) (a) 6m. of the statutes is created to read:AB620,9,64118.60 (2) (a) 6m. a. Except as provided in subd. 6m. c., beginning on July 1, 52027, all of the private school’s teachers have a teaching license or permit issued by 6the department.AB620,9,97b. Except as provided in subd. 6m. c., beginning on July 1, 2027, all of the 8private school’s administrators have an administrator’s license issued by the 9department.AB620,9,1910c. Any teacher or administrator employed by the private school on July 1, 112027, who has been teaching or employed as an administrator for at least the 5 12consecutive years immediately preceding July 1, 2027, and who does not satisfy the 13requirements under subd. 6m. a. or b. on July 1, 2027, applies to the department on 14a form prepared by the department for a temporary, nonrenewable waiver from the 15requirements under subd. 6m. a. or b. The department shall promulgate rules to 16implement this subd. 6m. c., including the form of the application and the process 17by which the waiver application will be reviewed. The application form shall 18require the applicant to submit a plan for satisfying the requirements under subd. 196m. a. or b. No waiver granted under this subd. 6m. c. is valid after July 1, 2032.AB620,1820Section 18. 118.60 (2) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB620,9,2221118.60 (2) (c) 3. Notwithstanding par. (a) 6m., a teacher employed by a private 22school participating in the program under this section who teaches only courses in 1rabbinical studies is not required to hold a license or permit to teach issued by the 2department.AB620,193Section 19. 118.60 (2) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB620,10,74118.60 (2) (c) 4. Notwithstanding par. (a) 6m., an administrator of a private 5school participating in the program under this section that prepares and trains 6pupils attending the school in rabbinical studies is not required to hold an 7administrator’s license issued by the department.AB620,208Section 20. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB620,10,139119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c., all of the private school’s 10teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s degree or 11a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, including a 12masters master’s or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited institution 13of higher education. This subd. 6. a. does not apply after June 30, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab620 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab620 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB620 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB620 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB620: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting